Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 27 Feeding of Untreated Garbage to Swine

Cross references. —

As to owner's claim for diseased animals slaughtered by state veterinarian with reference to foot and mouth disease among sheep and swine, see §

11-19-106

.

As to swine running at large, see §

11-26-101

.

As to livestock feedlot operation, see ch. 39 of this title.

As to requiring legislature to provide for the protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 28, 32, 36-41, 43, 46, 51; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 20 to 22; 39 Am. Jur. 2d Health § 1 et seq.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture § 3; 3A C.J.S. Animals § 318; 39A C.J.S. Health and Environment § 2 et seq.

§ 11-27-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the Wyoming livestock board;

“Garbage” means putrescible animal and vegetable wastes resulting from the handling, preparation, cooking and consumption of foods including animal carcasses or parts thereof;

“This act” means W.S.

11-27-101

through

11-27-107

.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 31, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-523; W.S. 1977, §

11-32-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-27-102.
Authority of livestock board generally.

Any authorized representative of the board may enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property to inspect or investigate conditions relating to the treating of garbage to be fed to swine.

Any authorized representative of the board may examine any records or memoranda pertaining to the feeding of garbage to swine. The board may require maintenance of records relating to the operation of equipment for and procedure of treating garbage to be fed to swine. Copies of the records shall be submitted to the board on request.

The board is charged with administration and enforcement of this act.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 31, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-524, 11-525; W.S. 1977, §§

11-32-102

,

11-32-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-27-101(a)(iii).

§ 11-27-103.
Feeding permit; application.

Any person desiring to
obtain a permit to feed garbage to swine shall make written application
to the board in accordance with the requirements of the board.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 31, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-526; W.S. 1977, §

11-32-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-27-104.
Feeding permit; requirement; renewal; annual fee; exception.

No person shall feed garbage to swine, without first securing a permit from the board. Permits shall be renewed on April 1 each year. The board shall charge one dollar ($1.00) for each annual permit.

This act does not apply to any person who feeds his own swine the garbage obtained only from his own household.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 31, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-527; W.S. 1977, § 11-32-105; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-27-101(a)(iii).

§ 11-27-105.
Feeding permit; revocation and refusal to issue.

Upon determination that
any person having a permit issued under this act, or who has applied
for a permit, has violated or failed to comply with any of the provisions
of this act or any of the rules or regulations promulgated thereunder,
the board may revoke the permit or refuse to issue a permit to an
applicant.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 31, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-528; W.S. 1977, § 11-32-106; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-27-101(a)(iii).

§ 11-27-106.
Treatment of garbage before feeding.

All garbage, regardless
of previous processing, before being fed to swine shall be thoroughly
heated to the boiling point for at least thirty (30) minutes, unless
treated in some other manner approved in writing by the board as being
equally effective for the protection of public health.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 31, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-529; W.S. 1977, § 11-32-107; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-27-107.
Penalties; injunctions; indemnity prohibited.

Any person who violates
or who fails to perform any duty imposed by this act, or who violates
any rule or regulation promulgated under this act shall be fined not
less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more than two hundred fifty
dollars ($250.00), or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months,
or both. In addition, the person may be enjoined from continuing the
violation. Each day upon which the violation occurs constitutes a
separate violation. No indemnity shall be paid by the state to any
person feeding garbage to swine in violation of this act.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 31, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 11-530; W.S. 1977, § 11-32-108; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-27-101(a)(iii).